Utah statutes.
10-8-85.8.   Indemnification of farmers markets.

A municipality may:

(1)  operate a farmers market, as defined in Section 4-5-2, on municipality-owned property in order to promote economic development;

(2)  indemnify a food producer participating in the farmers market; and

(3)  define the scope of the indemnification in an agreement with the food producer.

